Utah statutes.
53-7-217.   Portable fire extinguishers -- Permit required to perform
hydrostatic testing.
Each firm performing hydrostatic testing of portable fire extinguishers shall:
(1)  perform the tests in accordance with the specifications of the United
States Department of Transportation for compressed gas cylinders; and
(2)  obtain a permit from the division by applying in writing on forms
provided by the division.
